Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-821
Conviction more than twice; continue business dealing in obscene work or conduct; effect.

Any person who is convicted more than twice under sections 28-807 to 28-829 and continues to use, occupy, establish or conduct a business selling, distributing, disseminating, or exhibiting any obscene work, material, conduct or live performance shall be deemed to be maintaining a nuisance and shall be enjoined as provided for in sections 28-807 to 28-829.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 177.